dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
upȯlnomoćevati/Cs
meteorolog/Ct
pŕś/Cu
vųgȯlj/Cv
kaky/Cw
bȯz/Cx
mělky/Cy
tri/Cz
sȯbrati/DA
novosti/DB
jug/DC
dreti/DD
usta/DE
tutoj/DF
jagnę/DG
drožde/DH
usiľje/DI
klěšče/DJ
veś/DK
vråta/DE
ljudi/DB
ideolog/Ct
tamtoj/DF
zavojevati/Cs
bojevati/Cs
ekolog/Ct
ktory/Cw
luksemburg/DC
oś/Cu
bog/Ct
četyri/Cz
toj/DF
dveri/DB
sȯbrati/DA
noćevati/Cs
biolog/Ct
ktory/Cw
prěnoćevati/Cs
arheolog/Ct
nevrolog/Ct
děti/DB
maljevati/Cs
nožice/DJ
vojevati/Cs
jihny/Cw
dvojčęta/DE
sųprųg/Ct
věsti/DB
vråg/Ct
drug/Ct
jętra/DE
lěta/DE
telę/DG
šesterčęta/DE
trojčęta/DE
pråsę/DG
žrěbę/DG
četverčęta/DE
pęterčęta/DE
trojny/Cw
četverny/Cw
pęterny/Cw
šesterny/Cw
dvojaky/Cw
trojaky/Cw
četveraky/Cw
pęteraky/Cw
šesteraky/Cw
gųslje/DJ
psiholog/Ct
evangeľje/DI
financije/DJ
hirurg/Ct
katę/DG
pohmeľje/DI
smeti/DB
teolog/Ct
onoj/DF
jednorog/Ct
okolice/DJ
råzdreti/DD
tancevati/Cs
nosorog/Ct
vnųtrnosti/DB
astrolog/Ct
nogavice/DJ
papuče/DJ
radiolog/Ct
geolog/Ct
pedagog/Ct
pȯstrųg/Ct
sociolog/Ct
drva/DE
grabje/DJ
gųsę/DG
jelenę/DG
kotę/DG
kozorog/Ct
ljvę/DG
lisę/DG
medvědę/DG
mlådę/DG
obiľje/DI
obojaky/Cw
obsęg/DC
oddreti/DD
orlę/DG
oslę/DG
vakacije/DJ
valjcevati/Cs
varjag/Ct
veś/Cu
viking/Ct
zoolog/Ct
virolog/Ct
ščenę/DG
ping-pong/DC
obdreti/DD
sdreti/DD
bičevati/Cs
poněktory/Cw
naočila/DE
distancevati/Cs
prodreti/DD
ośmonog/Ct
aranževati/Cs
sanje/DJ
linčevati/Cs
